Utah statutes.
70C-2-103.   Deferral charges.
(1)  The parties to any consumer credit agreement before or after default may
agree in writing to defer all or part of one or more unpaid installments.
Except in connection with an open-end credit agreement, the parties may also
agree in writing at any time that if an installment is not paid within 10 days
after its due date, the creditor may unilaterally grant a deferral.  The
creditor may collect a reasonable charge which the debtor expressly agrees to
pay as consideration for a deferral.  A deferral charge may be collected at
the time it accrues or at any time thereafter.
(2)  A delinquency charge made by the creditor on an installment may not be
retained if a deferral charge is agreed to under this section covering the
same period of delinquency.  A creditor that accelerates the maturity of a
consumer credit debt may not make or collect a deferral charge for any period
following the date acceleration is declared.
